prince/dictionaries/hu.aff
SFX Q   0    jaikban      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaikba       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaikat       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaik         [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaiig        [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaihoz       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéért     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidévá      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéval     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéul      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidétól     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidét       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéról     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidért      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéra      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidénál     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidénak     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidén       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéiért    [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéivá     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéival    [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéiul     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéitól    [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéit      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéiról    [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéira     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéinál    [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéinak    [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéin      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéiig     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéihoz    [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéig      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéiból    [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéiban    [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéiba     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéi       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéhoz     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéból     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéban     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidéba      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidé        [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidul       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidtól      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidról      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidra       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidon       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidnál      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidnak      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidként     [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidkor      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidig       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidhoz      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaiddá       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaiddal      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidból      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidban      [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidba       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaidat       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaid         [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaiból       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaiban       [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jaiba        [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    jai          [^aáéóőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    ja           [áéióőuúüű]
SFX Q   0    ja           [^aáéóőuúüű]
